Maine, session 132, LD327.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Medical Care - Payments to Providers 0147
Initiative: Provides ongoing funding for in-home personal support services provided to
senior citizens under rule Chapter 101: MaineCare Benefits Manual, Chapter II, Section
19, Home and Community Benefits for the Elderly and Adults with Disabilities.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $1,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $1,000,000
139
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,631,588 $1,631,588
__________ __________
FEDERAL EXPENDITURES FUND TOTAL $1,631,588 $1,631,588